Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0039.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 109q. The department shall provide coverage under the medical assistance program for ultrasound procedures and fetal nonstress tests performed remotely in a residence or other off-site location through telemedicine. Sec. 109r. (1) The department shall amend its rules for fee-for-service and medical assistance managed care plans regarding reimbursement to allow reimbursement for remote ultrasound procedures and remote fetal nonstress tests utilizing established CPT codes for these procedures when the patient is in a residence or other off-site location from the patient's provider and the same standard of care is met. (2) Remote ultrasounds are reimbursable only when the provider uses digital technology as follows: (a) To collect medical and other forms of health data from a patient and electronically transmit that data securely to a health care provider in a different location for interpretation and recommendation. (b) That meets both of the following conditions: (i) Is compliant with the health insurance portability and accountability act of 1996, Public Law 104-191. (ii) Is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration. (3) Remote fetal nonstress tests are reimbursable only when all of the following conditions are met: (a) The requirements of subsection (2)(a) and (b) are met. (b) They have a place of service modifier for at-home monitoring with remote monitoring solutions that are cleared by the United States Food and Drug Administration for on-label use for monitoring fetal heart rate, maternal heart rate, or uterine activity. (4) The department shall adopt and publish guidelines to implement this section and section 109q.